Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 0 lor .

SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 0 lousie .

SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 0 lova .

SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 0 lsan .

SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 0 lster .

SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 0 lsworth .

SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 0 ltava .

SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 0 lton .

SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 0 lui .

SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 0 ly .

SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 0 m .

SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 0 ma .

SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 0 mabad .

SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 0 magata .

SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 0 magouste .

SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 0 maguchi .

SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 0 mal .

SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 0 man .

SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 0 manashi .

SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 0 mandjaro .

SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 0 mane .

SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 0 maoua .

SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 0 mar .

SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 0 mark .

SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 0 markt .

SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 0 marsch .

SFX 1268 N 1
SFX 1268 0 mas .

SFX 1269 N 1
SFX 1269 0 masina .

SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 0 matac .

SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 0 matilla .

SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 0 mato .

SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 0 matsu .

SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 0 mawa .

SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 0 may .

SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 0 mbol .

SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 0 mbra .

SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 0 meath .

SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 0 meï .

SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 0 menhorst .

SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 0 ment .

SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 0 meralda .

SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 0 meraldas .

SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 0 merdès .

SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 0 meta .

SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 0 mhill .

SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 0 mi .

SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 0 mia .

SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 0 mie .

SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 0 minster .

SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 0 mire .

SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 0 mla .

SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 0 mm .

SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 0 mma .

SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 0 mo .

SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 0 moga .

SFX 1297 N 1
SFX 1297 0 mond .

SFX 1298 N 1
SFX 1298 0 mong .

SFX 1299 N 1
SFX 1299 0 monoseki .

SFX 1300 N 1
SFX 1300 0 mont .

SFX 1301 N 1
SFX 1301 0 more .

SFX 1302 N 1
SFX 1302 0 moreland .

SFX 1303 N 1
SFX 1303 0 morency .

SFX 1304 N 1
SFX 1304 0 moskovsk .

SFX 1305 N 1
SFX 1305 0 moussoukro .

SFX 1306 N 1
SFX 1306 0 mpealeau .

SFX 1307 N 1
SFX 1307 0 mpuan .

SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 0 ms .

SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 0 mstadt .

SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 0 muahia .

SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 0 munanagar .

SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 0 münster .

SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 0 n .

SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 0 na .

SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 0 nabashi .

SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 0 nabo .

SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 0 nafuti .

SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 0 nagar .

SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 0 nah .

SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 0 naizah .

SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 0 naka .

SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 0 nan .

SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 0 naro .

SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 0 nas .

SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 0 nat .

SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 0 nbu .

SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 0 nbüttel .

SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 0 nça .

SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 0 ncabermeja .

SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 0 nce .

SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 0 ncey .

SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 0 nchang .

SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 0 ncheng .

SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 0 ncho .

SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 0 ncia .

SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 0 nčín .

SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 0 nd .

SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 0 nda .

SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 0 ndary .

SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 0 nde .

SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 0 ndo .

SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 0 ndon .

SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 0 ndong .

SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 0 ndorf .

SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 0 nds .

SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 0 ndwéogo .

SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 0 neberg .

SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 0 nepe .

SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 0 ner .

SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 0 neville .

SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 0 ng .

SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 0 ngalia .

SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 0 ngaran .

SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 0 ngcheng .

SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 0 ngchenggang .

SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 0 ngchun .

SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 0 ngdezhen .

SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 0 nggangshan .

SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 0 nghai .

SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 0 ngheni .

SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 0 nghong .

SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 0 nghua .

SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 0 ngjiang .

SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 0 ngju .

SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 0 ngluo .

SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 0 ngmen .

SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 0 ngning .

SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 0 ngon .

SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 0 ngping .

SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 0 ngqiu .

SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 0 ngquan .

SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 0 ngrao .

SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 0 ngtai .

SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 0 ngton .

SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 0 nguja .

SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 0 ngyang .

SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 0 ngyi .

SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 0 ngyu .

SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 0 ngzhi .

SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 0 ngzhou .

SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 0 nhae .

SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 0 nheim .

SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 0 nhua .

SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 0 ni .

SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 0 nia .

SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 0 nicapán .

SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 0 nicoi .

SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 0 nie .

SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 0 nieki .

SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 0 nindeua .

SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 0 ning .

SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 0 nion .

SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 0 nión .

SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 0 nji .

SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 0 njiang .

SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 0 nju .

SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 0 nkirchen .

SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 0 nkton .

SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 0 nle .

SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 0 nmi .

SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 0 nmin .

SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 0 nnin .

SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 0 nnon .

SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 0 nnur .

SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 0 notega .

SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 0 nquilla .

SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 0 nquitas .

SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 0 nrasset .

SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 ns .

SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 nse .

SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 nshi .

SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 nsiedel .

SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 nt .

SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 ntai .

SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 ntan .

SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 ntapur .

SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 nte .

SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 ntin .

SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 nto .

SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 ntou .

SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 0 ntua .

SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 0 nwald .

SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 0 nwei .

SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 0 nxi .

SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 0 nxiang .

SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 0 nyang .

SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 0 nyanga .

SFX 1428 N 1
SFX 1428 0 nyi .

SFX 1429 N 1
SFX 1429 0 nyu .

SFX 1430 N 1
SFX 1430 0 nzheng .

SFX 1431 N 1
SFX 1431 0 nzhong .

SFX 1432 N 1
SFX 1432 0 nzhou .

SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 0 o .

SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 0 oara .

SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 0 obón .

SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 0 ockholm .

SFX 1437 N 1
SFX 1437 0 ockport .

SFX 1438 N 1
SFX 1438 0 ockton .

SFX 1439 N 1
SFX 1439 0 oddard .

SFX 1440 N 1
SFX 1440 0 oeng .

SFX 1441 N 1
SFX 1441 0 oguan .

SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 0 ohobei .

SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 0 ohrad .

SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 0 oke .

SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 0 okes .

SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 0 ol .

SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 0 ols .

SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 0 om .

SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 0 oma .

SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 0 on .

SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 0 onaria .

SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 0 onburg .

SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 0 onda .

SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 0 ondjari .

SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 0 one .

SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 0 onewall .

SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 0 oney .

SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 0 ong .

SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 0 oni .

SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 0 ophe .

SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 0 ópolis .

SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 0 or .

SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 0 ora .

SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 0 orda .

SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 0 orey .

SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 0 ormarn .

SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 0 oros .

SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 0 ory .

SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 0 orz .

SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 0 os .

SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 0 oshan .

SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 0 otho .

SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 0 othukudi .

SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 0 otte .

SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 0 oudenitchani .

SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 0 oundé .

SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 0 our .

SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 0 ouzie .

SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 0 oviejo .

SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 0 ovsk .

SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 0 ow .

SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 0 owstone .

SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 0 owu .

SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 0 oxing .

SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 0 oyang .
