Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Addis/1450
Ado/1384
Anda/1243,1259
Arauca/1388
Banda/1253,1530
Bobo/1323
Braga/1328,1330
Brak/1314,1493
Burt/1389
Cabell/1433
Cache/1291,1724
Canton/1281
Chai/1325,1806
Clare/1342
Cole/1259,1599
Columbia/1314
Dane/1265
Davis/1450
Dent/1450
Dickens/1450
Dunhua/1351
Ech/1447
Faulk/1349
Flore/1330,1335,1599,1706
Gaga/1478
Gila/1313
Gordo/1313
Hami/1249
Harris/1450,1452
Hitachi/1321
Isla/1254,1337,1340,1345,1599
Kane/1252
Kent/1450,1728
Kili/1261,1599
Kirov/1443
Kyzyl/1464
Lamphu/1313
Luce/1314,1578
Matam/1467
Matara/1252
Mono/1314,1352
Morris/1450
Ode/1410,1422,1530,1657
Orla/1341
Oslo/1279
Paha/1351,1680
Petropavl/1480
Red/1453,1792
Roberts/1450
Rota/1319
Satu/1313,1487
Semara/1351
Side/1307
Sila/1351
Tanza/1388
Tho/1268,1351,1473,1579,1750
Tieli/1351
Timiș/1434
Toa/1269
Toro/1419
Toto/1386
Tsing/1459
Tyr/1446,1552
Verde/1313
Ware/1344
Weser/1267
Wolfe/1327
Yell/1481,1482
